Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202185-103.02
University of Nebraska; Board of Regents; population figures and maps; basis.

For purposes of section 85-103.01, the Legislature adopts the official population figures and maps from the 2020 Census Redistricting (Public Law 94-171) TIGER/Line Shapefiles published by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census.

Laws 1971, LB 1035, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 553, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 617, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 854, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB701, § 2;

Laws 2021, First Spec. Sess., LB8, § 2.
October 1, 2021